Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
346G]

HOSPITAL
SUSTAINABILITY PROGRAM

Section

346G-1 Title

346G-2 Findings and declaration of necessity

346G-3 Definitions

346G-4 Hospital sustainability program special
fund

346G-5 Hospital sustainability fee

346G-6 Hospital sustainability fee assessments

346G-7 Federal approval

346G-8 Multifacility locations

346G-9 Penalties for failure to pay the hospital

sustainability fee

346G-10 Private hospital payments through enhanced
rates

to medicaid managed care health plans

346G-11 Special designation of hospital
sustainability

program special fund

346G-12 Termination

346G-13 Severability

Note

Chapter repealed June 30, 2017, except for §346G-4, which is
repealed December 31, 2017. L 2012, c 217, §5; L 2013, c 141, §2; L 2014, c
123, §2; L 2015, c 70, §2; L 2016, c 60, §3.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next